Tables/Contraction/de-g2.ctb
always bläschen 12-123-345-234-1456-14 shouldn't use the sch-contraction
always blüschen 12-123-1256-234-1456-14
always döschen 145-246-234-1456-14 shouldn't use the sch-contraction
always füsschen 124-1256-2346-1456-14
always gläschen 1245-123-345-234-1456-14 shouldn't use the sch-contraction
always hälschen 125-345-123-234-1456-14
always häschen 125-345-234-1456-14 shouldn't use the sch-contraction
always häuschen 125-34-234-1456-14 shouldn't use the sch-contraction
always höschen 125-246-234-1456-14 should use the ch-contraction
always kabäuschen 13-1-12-34-234-1456-14
always küsschen 13-1256-2346-1456-14 shouldn't use the sch-contraction
always lieschen 123-346-234-1456-14 shouldn't use the sch-contraction
always mäuschen 134-34-234-1456-14
always möschen 134-246-234-1456-14 should use the ch-contraction
always näschen 1345-345-234-1456-14
always nüsschen 1345-1256-2346-1456-14
always radieschen 1235-1-145-346-234-1456-14 shouldn't use the sch-contraction
always reischen 1235-146-234-1456-14
always röschen 1235-246-234-1456-14 should use the ch-contraction
always fröschen 124-1235-246-156-14 should use the sch-contraction

begword rosaro = shouldn't use the ar-contraction
endword schef 234-1456-15-124
endword schefin 234-1456-15-124-35
endword schefins 234-1456-15-124-35-234
endword schefinnen 234-1456-15-124-35-1345-14
endword schefs 234-1456-15-124-234
endword eschef 123456-1456-15-124
endword eschefin 123456-1456-15-124-35
endword eschefins 123456-1456-15-124-35-234
endword eschefinnen 123456-1456-15-124-35-1345-14
endword eschefs 123456-1456-15-124-234
always schueler 156-1256-123-12456 should use the ue-symbol
always september 234-15-1234-2345-12356-12-12456 should use the em-contraction
always dezember 145-15-1356-12356-12-12456 shouldn't use the be-contraction
before s always sichts 234-3456-2345-234 Ansichtssache shouldn't use the ss-contraction
always silber 234-24-123-12-12456 shouldn't use the be-contraction
always ssitz 234-2-24 shouldn't use the ss-contraction
always ssonntag =
always sspiel 234-2-346
always ssprach 234-234-1234-1235-56
always sstand 234-2-23456
midendword stitel 234-2345-24-2345-13456
always stunde 23456-256-145-15 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always stunden 23456-256-145-14
always estunde 15-23456-256-145-15 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always estunden 15-23456-256-145-14
always esystem 15-234-6-13456-23456-12356 shouldn't use the es-contraction
always sturz 23456-136-1235-1356 Absturzursache shouldn't use the zu-contraction
always tagesstät 2345-1-1245-123456-23456-345-2345 shouldn't use the ss-contraction
always tagesstaet 2345-1-1245-123456-23456-345-2345 shouldn't use the ss-contraction
always team = shouldn't use the te-contraction
midendword termin 2345-12456-134-35 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always wagen 2456-1-1245-14 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always weiber 2456-146-12-12456 shouldn't use the be-contraction
sufword verbund 36-12-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
midendword verbund 1236-12456-12-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
midword versamm 1236-12456-234-1-1346 shouldn't use the sam-contraction
always viertel 1236-346-1235-2345-13456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
before g always zeitsta 1356-2345-234-2345-1
begword zion = zionist shouldn't use the nis-contraction
always zugantenn 1356-136-1245-235-2345-14-1345
always zweiseit 1356-2456-146-234-146-2345
always zweistaat 1356-2456-146-23456-2345 shouldn't use the weis-contraction

midendword heitstätig 125-234-2345-345-2345-45 gelegenheitstätigkeit shouldn't use the st-contraction
begmidword admiral 1-145-134-24-1235-25
begmidword astral 1-23456-1235-25
begmidword bifokal 12-24-124-135-13-25
#begmidword brachial 12-1235-56-24-25
begmidword bronchial 12-1235-135-1345-1456-24-25 bronchiallymphknoten shouldn't use the ll-contraction
begword general 1245-14-12456-25
begmidword kolonial 13-135-123-135-1345-24-25
begmidword zentral 1356-14-2345-1235-25 zentrallager
always schall 156-1-12345 schallen shouldn't use the allen-contraction
always herzultra 125-12456-1356-136-123-2345-1235-1 shouldn't use the zu-contraction
always mittagessen 134-24-2345-2345-1-1245-15-2346-14
always mittags 134-24-2345-2345-1-1245-234
always snakeskin 234-1345-1-13-15-234-13-35

# countries
always dänemark 145-345-1345-15-134-356-13 shouldn't use the em-contraction
always daenemark 145-345-1345-15-134-356-13 shouldn't use the em-contraction

# names
sufword aaron =
word abbey =
word angela 235-1245-13456-1 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
word angeles 235-1245-13456-123456 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
word angelika 235-1245-13456-24-13-1 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
word angelina 235-1245-13456-35-1 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
word angelo 235-1245-13456-135 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always aristotel 356-24-23456-135-2345-13456
always daniel 145-235-24-13456 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always gabriel 1245-1-12-1235-24-13456 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always gabriell 1245-1-12-1235-24-15-12345 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
sufword gerald 1245-12456-25-145
always gerlind 1245-12456-123-35-145 should use the er-contraction
always gervin 1245-12456-1236-35
always solveig 234-135-123-1235-146-1245 shouldn't use the so-contraction
word stella 23456-15-12345-1

always gasstrom 1245-1-234-23456-1235-135-134
always sinusstrom 234-35-136-234-23456-1235-135-134

endword stisch 234-2345-24-156
endword stische 234-2345-24-156-15
endword stischen 234-2345-24-156-14
endword stisches 234-2345-24-156-123456
endword stischs 234-2345-24-156-234
always agnostisch 1-1245-1345-135-23456-24-156
always akustisch 1-13-136-23456-24-156
always anankastisch 235-235-13-1-23456-24-156
always blastisch 12-123-1-23456-24-156
always bombastisch 12-135-134-12-1-23456-24-156
always chiastisch 1456-24-1-23456-24-156
always cineastisch 6-14-35-15-1-23456-24-156
always diagnostisch 145-24-1-1245-1345-135-23456-24-156
always doxastisch 145-135-6-1346-1-23456-24-156
always drastisch 145-1235-1-23456-24-156
always dynastisch 145-6-13456-1345-1-23456-24-156
always elastisch 13456-1-23456-24-156
always fantastisch 124-235-2345-1-23456-24-156
always faustisch 124-16-23456-24-156
always gespenstisch 12346-234-1234-14-23456-24-156
always gnostisch 1245-1345-135-23456-24-156
always gymnastisch 1245-6-13456-134-1345-1-23456-24-156
always ikonoklastisch 24-13-135-1345-135-13-123-1-23456-24-156
always kataklystisch 13-1-2345-1-13-123-6-13456-23456-24-156
always kaustisch 13-16-23456-24-156
always klastisch 13-123-1-23456-24-156
always monastisch 134-135-1345-1-23456-24-156
always marastisch 134-356-1-23456-24-156
always mystisch 134-6-13456-23456-24-156
always periphrastisch 1234-12456-24-1234-125-1235-1-23456-24-156
always plastisch 1234-123-1-23456-24-156
always pleonastisch 1234-123-15-135-1345-1-23456-24-156
always orgastisch 26-1245-1-23456-24-156
always orgiastisch 26-1245-24-1-23456-24-156
always phantastisch 1234-125-235-2345-1-23456-24-156
sufword prognostisch 12345-1245-1345-135-23456-24-156
always sarkastisch 234-356-13-1-23456-24-156
always scholastisch 156-135-123-1-23456-24-156
always spastisch 234-1234-1-23456-24-156
always stochastisch 23456-135-1456-1-23456-24-156
endword sterror 234-2345-12456-1235-135-1235
always sterror 234-2345-12456-1235-26
before e always sterrass 234-2345-12456-1235-1-2346
before e always monsterrass 134-135-1345-23456-12456-1235-1-2346
before e always stribün =
before e always strepp =
before e always strupp =
prfword stür 234-2345-1256-1235
prfword stüren 234-2345-1256-1235-14
before aeu midendword stast 234-2345-1-23456
always schrist 234-1456-1235-24-23456

# TODO:
# 8-Punkte-Plan

# inline contraction of emoji descriptions
emoji de
